Washington statutes.
RCW 26.04.100

Filing and recording—County auditor.

The county auditor shall file said certificates and record them or bind them into numbered volumes, and note on the original index to the license issued the volume and page wherein such certificate is recorded or bound. He or she shall enter the date of filing and his or her name on the certificates for the files of the state registrar of vital statistics, and transmit, by the tenth day of each month, all such certificates filed with him or her during the preceding month.

[ 2011 c 336 s 684; 1967 c 26 s 5; 1947 c 59 s 2; 1886 p 66 s 1; Code 1881 s 2386; 1867 p 105 s 2; 1866 p 82 s 8; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 8446.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1967 c 26: See note following RCW 43.70.150.